Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB385.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 2 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Domestic cats (Felis catus) and dogs (Canis familiaris) that reside in or have been
adopted from Kentucky animal shelters or rescue organizations are named and
designated as the official pets of the Commonwealth of Kentucky.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/27/2025 3:14 PM Jacketed